Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202648-4101
Health Care Staffing Agency Registration Act, how cited.

Sections 48-4101 to 48-4109 shall be known and may be cited as the Health Care Staffing Agency Registration Act.

Laws 2026, LB921, § 7.
July 1, 2027